Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Article 3. Finances

§ 711.
Repealed. 2003, No. 130 (Adj. Sess.), § 15(3).

§ 711a.
Establishment of union district budget.

The board of directors of the union district shall at each annual meeting present an estimate of the expenses for the ensuing year, and the district shall appropriate that sum that it deems necessary for the expenses, together with the amount required to pay any balance left unpaid from the preceding year, expressing the sum in dollars in its vote. If a budget for the operation of the district is not approved, a subsequent meeting or meetings shall be called pursuant to section 706p of this title. At its first annual meeting, the district shall similarly vote a sum sufficient to pay any unpaid balance of expenses, as defined in section 706j of this title, that was incurred by or on behalf of the district since the date on which the vote was taken to form the union district.

If a budget has not been approved on or before June 30 of any year, the school board may borrow funds pursuant to the authority granted under section 566 of this title.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 31; amended

1977, No. 4

;

1995, No. 32

, § 2;

2003, No. 68

, § 83, eff. June 18, 2003;

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 16(d).

§ 711b.
Repealed. 2003, No. 130 (Adj. Sess.), § 15(4).

§ 711c.
Tuition rate for union school district.

Any student, a resident of a nonmember town may, in the discretion of the board of union school directors, be admitted equally with participating member students; provided, however, that the tuition paid is a rate not greater than the calculated net cost per pupil as defined under section 825 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 33.

§ 711d.
Improvements, indebtedness, bonds, early or absentee voters.

Improvements may be made by a union school district for the purposes for which the district is established as provided in this subchapter, and indebtedness may be incurred for the improvements as provided by

24 V.S.A. §§ 1751-1786a

. Early or absentee voting in accordance with

17 V.S.A. §§ 2531-2550

shall be permitted on questions concerning bond issues of the union school district. The debt limit of the union school district shall be ten times the sum total of the education grand lists of the member districts composing the union, without diminution for any obligation incurred by a member district alone. The amount of indebtedness of a union school district incurred to finance any project approved under sections 3447 to 3456 of this title shall not be considered a part of the indebtedness of the union school district for purposes of determining its debt limit. Obligations incurred under

24 V.S.A. §§ 1751-1786a

, or as otherwise authorized in this subchapter by a union school district, shall be the joint and several obligations of the district and of each of the member districts composing it. Any joint or several liability incurred by a member district under the provisions of this subchapter shall not be considered in determining its debt limit for its own separate purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 34; amended

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. March 11, 1998;

2001, No. 6

, § 12(b), (c), eff. April 10, 2001;

2003, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 711e.
Budget votes by Australian ballot.

A union school district may vote to establish its budget by Australian ballot under the provisions of

17 V.S.A. § 2680

. At the same time, the union school district shall also vote whether the ballots shall be commingled.

The votes whether to use the Australian ballot and whether to commingle the ballots shall be taken by written ballot. The questions shall be in substantially the following form:

“Shall the (union school district name) adopt its budget by Australian ballot?”

“If the (union school district name) votes to adopt its budget by Australian ballot, shall the ballots be commingled?”

If the union school district has voted to adopt its budget by Australian ballot, the question shall be in substantially the following form:

“Shall the (union school district name) adopt a budget of $
. . . . . . . .
for school year
. . . . . . . .
?”

If the union school district has voted to commingle its ballots, the ballots shall be deposited in separate containers at each polling place. The board of civil authority may open the containers and count the number of ballots cast in the election, but shall not count the ballots for purposes of determining the outcome of the election. At the closing of the polls, the municipal clerk or his or her designee shall appoint a member or members of the board of civil authority who shall transport the sealed container to the clerk of the union school district. Under the supervision of the union school district clerk, the appointed members of the boards of civil authority shall count the commingled ballots. The budget shall be established if a majority of the votes cast are in favor.

If the union school district has voted not to commingle its ballots, the municipal clerks of the member towns shall transmit to the union school district clerk the results of the vote upon completion of the counting. The budget shall be established if a majority of the votes cast are in favor.

If the proposed budget is rejected, the union district board shall prepare a revised budget. The board shall establish a date for vote on the revised budget and shall take appropriate steps to warn a public informational meeting on the budget and the vote. The date of the public informational meeting shall be at least five days following the public notice. The date of the vote shall be at least seven days following the public notice. The vote on the revised budget shall be by Australian ballot and shall take place in the same locations that the first vote was taken. The budget shall be established if a majority of all votes cast are in favor. If the revised budget is rejected, the board shall repeat the procedure in this subsection until the budget is adopted.

Unless clearly inconsistent, the provisions of 17 V.S.A. chapter 55 shall apply to actions taken under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 65

; amended

1989, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2003, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 712.
Repealed. 1997, No. 71 (Adj. Sess.), § 106(b), eff. March 11, 1998.